District of Columbia statutes.
44-783

Repealed

Receipt of contagious-disease cases by Providence and Garfield Memorial Hospitals.

Repealed.

July 1, 1898, 30 Stat. 635, ch. 546
Aug. 1, 1950, 64 Stat. 393, ch. 513, § 1
Feb. 24, 1984, D.C. Law 5-48, § 12(j), 30 DCR 5778
1981 Ed., § 32-115.
1973 Ed., § 32-316.